North Dakota, session 69, SB2350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 44-04-18.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
44-04-18.1. Public employee personal, medical, and employee assistance records -
Confidentiality - Personal information maintained by state entities - Exempt.
1. Any record of a public employee's medical treatment or use of an employee
assistance program is not to become part of that employee's personnel record and is
confidential and, except as otherwise authorized by law, may not be used or disclosed
without the written authorization of the employee. As used in this section, the term
"public employee" includes any individual who has applied for employment, is
employed, or has been employed by a public entity.
2. Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, personal information regarding a
public employee contained in an employee's personnel record or given to the state or
a political subdivision by the employee in the course of employment is exempt. As
used in this section, "personal information" means a person's month and day of birth;
home address; home telephone number or personal cell phone number; photograph;
medical information; motor vehicle operator's identification number; public employee
identification number; payroll deduction information; the name, address, telephone
number, and date of birth of any dependent or emergency contact; any credit, debit, or
electronic fund transfer card number; and any account number at a bank or other
financial institution. Information regarding the type of leave taken by an employee is
Page No. 1 25.1265.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
exempt, although the amount of leave taken or accrued, and the dates of the leave
taken, is public record. Information regarding leave applied for but not yet taken is
exempt until the leave is taken. Performance and discipline records are exempt for
three years or until termination of employment, whichever occurs first, unless the
records are part of an internal investigation under subsection 6 or requested by a law
enforcement agency as part of a hiring process.
3. Nonconfidential information contained in a personnel record of an employee of a
public entity as defined in subdivision c of subsection 13 of section 44-04-17.1 is
exempt.
4. Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, personal information regarding a
licensee maintained by an occupational or professional board, association, state
agency, or commission created by law is exempt. As used in this section, "licensee"
means an individual who has applied for, holds, or has held in the past an
occupational or professional license, certificate, credential, permit, or registration
issued by a state occupational or professional board, association, agency, or
commission.
5. Information relating directly to persons engaged in an organized public safety peer
counseling or a public safety peer debriefing is exempt.
6. Records relating to a public entity's internal investigation of a complaint against a
public entity or employee for misconduct are exempt until the investigation of the
complaint is complete, but no longer than seventy-fiveone hundred and eighty
calendar days from the date of the complaint.
Page No. 2 25.1265.03000